District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

6-1153

Review and approval of applications

Expired.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-93, § 2, 45 DCR 1316
1981 Ed., §§ 5-1031 to 5-1037.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see §§ 2 through 8 of the New Washington Convention Center Neighborhood Stability Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-238, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 503).

D.C. Law 12-93, § 10(b) ( 45 DCR 1316), eff. April 29, 1998, provided: “(b) This act shall remain in effect for a period not to exceed 18 months from the effective date of this act.”

Sections 6-1151 to 6-1157 expired effective October 30, 1999.